Louisiana, session 2026, HB175.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:9031 and 9032 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§9031. Veterans Service Grant Board; disbursement of funds
A. The Veterans Service Grant Board, hereafter referred to as the "veterans
board", is hereby created to be solely responsible for the disbursement of the funds
in the Veterans Service Grant Fund to programs or entities with the purpose of
bettering the lives of veterans in this state. Veterans board members shall serve
without compensation and shall not require confirmation by the Senate.
B. The secretary of the Department of Veterans Affairs shall serve as
chairman until the first meeting of the veterans board, at which time the veterans
board shall elect a chairman and vice chairman. The chairman and vice chairman
shall be elected annually.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-35 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 175
C. The veterans board shall meet annually in person to review submitted
grant applications and disburse grant funds to selected applicants.
D. The veterans board shall consist of the following members:
(1) The secretary of the Department of Veterans Affairs or his designee.
(2) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health or his designee.
(3) The secretary of Louisiana Economic Development or his designee.
(4) The state commander of the Veterans of Foreign Wars, Department of
Louisiana, or his designee.
(5) The commander of the American Legion, Department of Louisiana, or
his designee.
(6) The state commander of the Disabled American Veterans, Department
of Louisiana, or his designee.
(7) A veteran of the United States Armed Forces appointed by the governor.
E. A majority of the veterans board shall constitute a quorum. Voting by
proxy, by representation, or by mail is prohibited.
F. The veterans board shall meet once a year to distribute proceeds received
from the Department of Treasury to the Veterans Service Grant Fund in the form of
one-time grants. Applicants shall be one of the following:
(1) Tax-exempt under Section 501(C)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and
in existence for three years.
(2) An accredited college or university in this state.
(3) The Junior Reserve Officers' Training Corps (JROTC).
(4) An established Veterans Court program pursuant to R.S. 13:5361 et seq.
(5) A police jury or municipal governing authority seeking to improve parish
veterans' service offices pursuant to R.S. 29:262.
G. The veterans board shall only consider applicants who seek to improve
the needs of veterans and their families. Each one-time grant shall be made in
amounts up to fifty thousand dollars. Applicants are not restricted from reapplying
for future grants.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-35 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 175
§9032. Veterans Service Grant Fund
A. There is hereby established in the state treasury, as a special fund, the
Veterans Service Grant Fund, hereafter referred to in this Section as the "fund". After
allocation of monies to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as provided in
Article VII, Section (9)(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the treasurer shall
deposit into the fund five hundred thousand dollars from the Lottery Proceeds Fund
as provided in Article XII, Section 6 of the Constitution of Louisiana. Monies in the
fund shall only be appropriated for grants awarded by the Veterans Service Grant
Board in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 47:9031.
B. Monies in the fund shall be invested in the same manner as monies in the
state general fund. Interest earned on investment of monies in the fund shall be
credited to the fund. Unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the end
of the fiscal year shall be deposited into the Lottery Proceeds Fund.
Section 2. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the proposed
amendment of Article XII of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act which
originated as House Bill No. 165 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is adopted
at a statewide election and becomes effective.